Massachusetts, session 194th, S706.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the commissioner of
insurance shall develop a list of services that are appropriate for real-time automated approvals
of prior authorization requests of covered services when the clinical information submitted
electronically by a provider clearly establishes that the patient meets the medical necessity
criteria for the requested service. In developing the list, the commissioner shall seek input from
the Massachusetts Collaborative and other interested stakeholders, and focus on services with
high prior authorization approval rates and clearly established clinical treatment protocols. The
division of insurance shall publish the list on its website not later than January 1, 2027. Carriers
that require prior authorization for services on the published list shall implement an automated
process for the real-time approval of covered services that clearly meet medical necessity criteria
not later than January 1, 2028.
of 1